it: Idoneità della resina: Approvato per resina; Senza resina; Idoneo con o senza resina; Altro
th: ความเหมาะสมกับเรซิน: ใช้เรซินได้; ปราศจากเรซิน; ใช้ได้ทั้งแบบมีและไม่มีเรซิน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Съвместимост на смолата: Одобрено за смола; Без смола; Подходящо със или без смола; Други
de: Harzeignung: Für Harz zugelassen; Harzfrei; Geeignet mit oder ohne Harz; Sonstiges
pl: Przydatność żywicy: Zatwierdzone do żywicy; Bez żywicy; Odpowiednie do stosowania z żywicą lub bez; Inne
en: Resin suitability: Resin approved; Resin free; Suitable with or without resin; Other
zh-TW: 樹脂適用性: 樹脂適用; 無樹脂; 有或無樹脂皆適用; 其他
fr: Compatibilité avec la résine: Approuvé pour la résine; Sans résine; Adapté avec ou sans résine; Autre
ko: 수지 적합성: 레진 사용 가능; 무레진; 레진 포함 및 미포함 사용 가능; 기타
sk-SK: Vhodnosť živice: Schválené pre živicu; Bez živice; Vhodné so živicou alebo bez nej; Iné
zh-CN: 树脂适用性: 适用树脂; 无树脂; 适用或不适用树脂; 其他
pt-PT: Compatibilidade com resina: Aprovada para resina; Sem resina; Adequada com ou sem resina; Outra
nb: Harpiks-egnethet: Godkjent for harpiks; Harpiksfri; Egnet med eller uten harpiks; Annet
lt-LT: Dervos tinkamumas: Tinka dervai; Be dervos; Tinka su derva arba be jos; Kita
es: Idoneidad de la resina: Aprobado para resina; Sin resina; Apto con o sin resina; Otro
sl-SI: Primernost za uporabo s smolo: Odobreno za smolo; Brez smole; Primerno s smolo ali brez nje; Drugo
el: Συμβατότητα με ρητίνη: Εγκεκριμένο για ρητίνη; Χωρίς ρητίνη; Κατάλληλο με ή χωρίς ρητίνη; Άλλο
vi: Độ phù hợp của nhựa: Được chấp thuận dùng với nhựa; Không chứa nhựa; Phù hợp cả khi có hoặc không có nhựa; Khác
hu: Gyanta megfelelősége: Gyantához alkalmas; Gyantamentes; Gyantával vagy anélkül is használható; Egyéb
pt-BR: Resina adequação: Aprovado para resina; Livre de resina; Adequado com ou sem resina; Outro
ro-RO: Compatibilitate cu rășina: Aprobat pentru rășină; Fără rășină; Potrivit cu sau fără rășină; Altele
ru: Пригодность для использования смолы: Одобрено для смолы; Без смолы; Подходит для использования со смолой и без нее; Другое
hr-HR: Prikladnost smole: Odobreno za smolu; Bez smole; Prikladno sa smolom ili bez nje; Ostalo
nl: Hars geschiktheid: Geschikt voor hars; Harsvrij; Geschikt met of zonder hars; Overig
fi: Hartsille soveltuvuus: Hartsille hyväksytty; Hartsiton; Sopii hartsin kanssa tai ilman; Muu
da: Egnethed til harpiks: Godkendt til resin; Resinfri; Egnet med eller uden resin; Andet
cs: Vhodnost pryskyřice: Vhodné pro pryskyřici; Neobsahuje pryskyřici; Vhodné k použití s pryskyřicí i bez ní; Jiné
sv: Lämplighet för harts: Godkänd för resin; Resinfri; Lämplig med eller utan resin; Annat
ja: 樹脂の適合性: レジン対応; レジンフリー; レジン有無に関わらず対応; その他
tr: Reçine uygunluğu: Reçine onaylı; Reçinesiz; Reçineli veya reçinesiz kullanıma uygun; Diğer